Wisconsin, session 2025, AB300.
do enact as follows:AB300,13Section 1. 165.985 of the statutes is created to read:AB300,1,54165.985 Automated registration plate reader grant program. (1) In 5this section:AB300,2,31(a) “Automated registration plate reader system” means one or more high-2speed cameras combined with data processing to convert images of registration 3plates and vehicles into computer readable data.AB300,2,104(b) “Law enforcement agency” means an agency of a political subdivision of 5this state or of a federally recognized Indian tribe or band in this state whose 6purpose is the detection and prevention of crime and enforcement of laws or 7ordinances and whose employees are authorized to make arrests for crimes or 8violations of ordinances. “Law enforcement agency” includes the Marquette 9University police department under s. 175.42. “Law enforcement agency” does not 10include an agency of the state.AB300,2,1311(c) “Rural area” means a city, town, or village in this state that has a 12population of less than 20,000 and that is at least 15 miles from any city, town, or 13village that has a population of at least 20,000.AB300,2,1814(2) The department of justice shall award grants to law enforcement agencies 15to purchase automated registration plate reader systems to be used for public safety 16and law enforcement purposes. The department of justice shall ensure that at least 1750 percent of the grant moneys awarded under this section are awarded to law 18enforcement agencies located in rural areas.AB300,2,2219(3) A law enforcement agency may apply to the department of justice for a 20grant under this section and shall include a proposed plan of expenditure of the 21grant moneys. The department of justice shall review each application and plan 22and may provide a grant under this section to any law enforcement agency.AB300,2,2323